pt-PT: Tipo de cabine de camião híbrido: Apenas cabina; Chassis-cabina; Cabina de tripulação; Cabina dupla; Cabina alongada; Megacabina; Cabina normal; Outro
zh-TW: 混合動力卡車駕駛室類型: 僅駕駛室; 底盤駕駛室; 雙排座駕駛室; 四門雙排座駕駛室; 一廂半駕駛室; 特大駕駛室; 單排座駕駛室; 其他
es: Tipo de cabina de camión híbrido: Solo cabina; Chasis cabina; Cabina doble (Crew cab); Cabina doble; Cabina extendida; Mega cabina; Cabina regular; Otro
ko: 하이브리드 트럭 캡 타입: 캡 전용; 섀시 캡; 크루 캡; 더블 캡; 익스텐디드 캡; 메가 캡; 레귤러 캡; 기타
sk-SK: Typ kabíny hybridného nákladného vozidla: Iba kabína; Podvozok s kabínou; Kabína pre posádku; Dvojitá kabína; Predĺžená kabína; Mega kabína; Štandardná kabína; Iné
zh-CN: 混合动力卡车驾驶室类型: 仅驾驶室; 底盘驾驶室; 乘员驾驶室; 双排座驾驶室; 加长型驾驶室; 超大驾驶室; 标准驾驶室; 其他
bg-BG: Тип кабина на хибриден камион: Само кабина; Шаси-кабина; Кабина за екипаж; Двойна кабина; Удължена кабина; Мега кабина; Стандартна кабина; Други
el: Τύπος καμπίνας υβριδικού φορτηγού: Μόνο καμπίνα; Πλαίσιο με καμπίνα; Καμπίνα πληρώματος; Διπλή καμπίνα; Εκτεταμένη καμπίνα; Καμπίνα mega; Κανονική καμπίνα; Άλλο
hu: Hibrid teherautó fülke típusa: Csak fülke; Alvázas fülke; Crew cab; Duplafülke; Nyújtott fülke; Mega cab; Szimplafülke; Egyéb
tr: Hibrit kamyon kabin tipi: Yalnızca kabin; Şasi kabin; Mürettebat kabini; Çift kabin; Uzatılmış kabin; Mega kabin; Standart kabin; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de cabine de caminhão híbrido: Apenas cabine; Cabine chassi; Cabine dupla estendida; Cabine dupla; Cabine estendida; Mega cabine; Cabine simples; Outro
it: Tipo di cabina del camion ibrido: Solo cabina; Autotelaio cabinato; Crew cab; Doppia cabina; Cabina estesa; Mega cabina; Cabina singola; Altro
de: Typ der Hybrid-Lkw-Kabine: Nur Fahrerhaus; Fahrgestell mit Fahrerhaus; Mannschaftskabine; Doppelkabine; Erweiterte Kabine; Mega Cab; Einzelkabine; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทห้องโดยสารของรถบรรทุกไฮบริด: หัวเก๋งอย่างเดียว; แชสซีแค็บ; ครูว์แค็บ; ดับเบิ้ลแค็บ; ตอนครึ่ง; เมกะแค็บ; ตอนเดียว; อื่นๆ
ja: ハイブリッドトラックのキャブタイプ: キャブのみ; シャシーキャブ; クルーキャブ; ダブルキャブ; エクステンドキャブ; メガキャブ; レギュラーキャブ; その他
fr: Type de cabine du camion hybride: Cabine seule; Châssis-cabine; Cabine double; Double cabine; Cabine allongée; Méga cabine; Cabine simple; Autre
da: Førerhustype for hybridlastbil: Kun førerhus; Chassisførerhus; Crew cab; Dobbeltkabine; Forlænget førerhus; Mega cab; Standardførerhus; Andet
nb: Hybrid lastebilførerhustype: Kun førerhus; Chassis-førerhus; Crew cab; Dobbeltkabin; Forlenget førerhus; Mega cab; Standard førerhus; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta kabine hibridnega tovornjaka: Samo kabina; Šasija s kabino; Kabina za posadko; Dvojna kabina; Podaljšana kabina; Mega kabina; Enojna kabina; Drugo
cs: Typ kabiny hybridního nákladního vozu: Pouze kabina; Podvozek s kabinou; Crew cab; Double cab; Prodloužená kabina; Mega cab; Standardní kabina; Ostatní
nl: Hybride vrachtwagen cabine type: Alleen cabine; Chassis-cabine; Crew cab; Dubbele cabine; Verlengde cabine; Megacabine; Standaardcabine; Overig
hr-HR: Tip kabine hibridnog kamiona: Samo kabina; Šasija s kabinom; Putnička kabina; Dvostruka kabina; Produžena kabina; Mega kabina; Obična kabina; Ostalo
ru: Тип кабины гибридного грузовика: Только кабина; Шасси с кабиной; Двойная кабина (Crew cab); Двойная кабина (Double cab); Удлиненная кабина; Мега-кабина; Одинарная кабина; Другое
fi: Hybridikuorma-auton ohjaamotyyppi: Vain ohjaamo; Alusta ja ohjaamo; Miehistöohjaamo; Kaksoisohjaamo; Pidennetty ohjaamo; Mega-ohjaamo; Vakio-ohjaamo; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul de cabină al camionului hibrid: Doar cabină; Cabină cu șasiu; Cabină echipaj; Cabină dublă; Cabină extinsă; Cabină mega; Cabină normală; Altele
lt-LT: Hibridinio sunkvežimio kabinos tipas: Tik kabina; Važiuoklė su kabina; Keleivinė kabina; Dviguba kabina; Prailginta kabina; Didelė kabina; Įprasta kabina; Kita
en: Hybrid truck cab type: Cab-only; Chassis cab; Crew cab; Double cab; Extended cab; Mega cab; Regular cab; Other
vi: Loại cabin xe tải hybrid: Chỉ có cabin; Cabin sát xi; Cabin kép (Crew cab); Cabin đôi (Double cab); Cabin mở rộng (Extended cab); Cabin cỡ lớn (Mega cab); Cabin tiêu chuẩn (Regular cab); Khác
pl: Typ kabiny ciężarówki hybrydowej: Tylko kabina; Podwozie z kabiną; Podwójna kabina (crew cab); Podwójna kabina (double cab); Przedłużona kabina; Mega kabina; Pojedyncza kabina; Inne
sv: Hytttyp för hybridlastbil: Endast hytt; Chassihytt; Dubbelhytt (crew cab); Dubbelhytt; Förlängd hytt; Megahytt; Enkelhytt; Övrigt